Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5132XS (1) 91 ms/js S.F. 2029 Section 1. Section 331.907, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The annual compensation of the auditor, treasurer, 3 recorder, sheriff, county attorney, and supervisors shall 4 be determined as provided in this section . The county 5 compensation board annually shall review the compensation 6 paid to comparable officers in other counties of this state, 7 other states, private enterprise, and the federal government. 8 In setting recommending the salary of the county sheriff, 9 the county compensation board shall set the sheriffâs salary 10 so that it is comparable to salaries paid to professional 11 law enforcement administrators and command officers of the 12 state patrol, the division of criminal investigation of the 13 department of public safety, and city police chiefs employed 14 by cities of similar population to the population of the 15 county , applying the statistical mean of these positions . When 16 determining the average salary of police chiefs employed by 17 cities of similar population to the population of the county, 18 the compensation board shall use the statistical mean of the 19 salaries of city police chiefs employed by cities with a 20 population between one thousand less than and one thousand more 21 than the population of the county. The county compensation 22 board shall prepare a compensation schedule for the elected 23 county officers for the succeeding fiscal year. The county 24 compensation board shall provide documentation to the board of 25 supervisors that demonstrates how the county compensation board 26 determined the recommended compensation schedule, including 27 by providing the applicable compensation information for 28 comparable officers in other counties of this state, other 29 states, private enterprise, and the federal government. A 30 recommended compensation schedule requires a majority vote of 31 the membership of the county compensation board. 32 Sec. 2. Section 331.907, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The attorney general may bring an action 35 -1- LSB 5132XS (1) 91 ms/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2029 against a county for a writ of mandamus to compel the county to 1 comply with this section. 2